Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.300

Proceedings against delinquent personal representative.

The succeeding administrator, or remaining personal representative may proceed by law against any delinquent former personal representative, or his or her personal representatives, or the sureties of either, or against any other person possessed of any part of the estate.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2022; 1965 c 145 s 11.28.300. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 79; RRS s 1449; prior: 1891 p 384 s 20; Code 1881 s 1430; 1854 p 273 s 41.]

NOTES:

Limitation of action against sureties: RCW 11.28.235.